Massachusetts, session 194th, H798.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1. Pursuant to the provisions of section 3, of chapter 111 of the General Laws, as 
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, the department shall promulgate regulations providing 
that each nursing home and rest home as defined in section 71 of said chapter 111, shall submit a 
plan to the department demonstrating how said facility shall treat all residents with dignity at all 
times, and shall demonstrate that treatment of residents with dignity shall be the basis of any 
rules and regulations and in training and orientation of all staff. 
Section 2. Said plan shall demonstrate how such facility shall guarantee single occupancy 
rooms to all residents with individual lavatory for each room not later than July 1, 2027. The 
department may provide an extension of said deadline provided that the applicant demonstrates 
good faith effort toward compliance within a reasonable time period. 

of 2 11  Section 3. No resident of a nursing home or rest home shall be compelled to live in a 
room with a roommate, provided, however, a resident may opt to share a room under the 
following circumstances. 
a. Married couples or partners 
b. Family members who choose to share a room 
c. Individual whose treatment plan indicate that they need the stimulation to minimize 
health deterioration. 
A semi-private room shall be defined by regulation promulgated by the department, but 
shall be sufficiently spacious to provide privacy for each resident, space for facility equipment, 
beds, supplies, television, personal item and clothing storage and seating for visitors. 
Section 4. Said nursing home or rest home shall provide that residents shall be given the 
option of in room dining at no additional increase in fees. 
Section 5. No nursing home or rest home shall permit three or more residents per room. 
Section 6. Penalties. Failure of a nursing home or rest home to comply with the 
provisions of this chapter, unless a waiver of the deadline as provided in section 2, shall be 
determined to be deficient and a fine of $1,000 dollars per day for each room determined to be 
deficient.